Illinois, session 104th, HB2199.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Massage Therapy Practice Act is amended by 5changing Section 30 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 57/30)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 30. Title protection. 9    (a) Persons regulated by this Act are designated as 10massage therapists and and therefore are exclusively entitled 11to utilize the terms "massage", "massage therapy", and 12"massage therapist" when advertising or printing promotional 13material.14    (b) Anyone who knowingly aids and abets one or more 15persons not authorized to use a professional title regulated 16by this Act or knowingly employs persons not authorized to use 17the regulated professional title in the course of their 18employment, commits a violation of this Act.19    (c) Anyone not authorized, under the definitions of this 20Act, to utilize the term "massage", "massage therapy", or 21"massage therapist" and who knowingly utilizes these terms 22when advertising commits a violation of this Act.23    (d) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit the use of the terms   HB2199- 2 -LRB104 11669 AAS 21758 b1"massage", "massage therapy", or "massage therapist" by a 2salon registered under the Barber, Cosmetology, Esthetics, 3Hair Braiding, and Nail Technology Act of 1985, provided that 4the salon offers massage therapy services in accordance with 5this Act. 6(Source: P.A. 97-514, eff. 8-23-11.)